Tennessee, session 114, HB1538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-903(a)(5), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-903(b)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "(a)(1)-(5)" and substituting "(a)(1)-(4)".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-201(b), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(3) Knowingly use an unmanned aircraft over any portion of a property that
includes a correctional facility. As used in this section, "unmanned aircraft" means the
same as defined in § 39-13-901.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-201(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) A violation of subdivision (b)(1)(A), (b)(2)(A), or (b)(3) is a Class C felony.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-201, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(d) A correctional facility employee may disable an unmanned aircraft that is
operating over property that includes a correctional facility in violation of subdivision
(b)(3). The correctional facility and the correctional facility employee are not liable for
damage to the unmanned aircraft as a result of being disabled.
SECTION 6. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1538
009515
- 1 -